src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v2  !!≈ * **@CODE@** huomata, haluta övriga former 
+V+Inf:^WG%>t^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>^Am^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>^Av^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>^Av^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%^WG%>t^A K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>si2n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>si2t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>si2 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>si2mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>si2tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>si2t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>si2v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>si2v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%^WG%>t^U K ;

+V+Inf+Tra:^WG%>^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:^WGt%>en K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:^WGt%>ess^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>^Amh^A^An K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>^Am^HMET2%>h^A^An K ;
+V+InfMa+Ine:%>^Am^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:%>^Am^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Abe:%>^Am^Att^A K ;

+V+Pass+Cond:tta%>i4s K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>^Av^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG%>^Av^At K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:^WGt%>t^Av^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:^WGt%>t^Av^At K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%>nhee ptc_obl ; ! CHECK använder bara Pl+Nom
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG^HMET2%>nheet K ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WGt%>t^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^WGt%>^Ut K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:^WG # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kh^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ;

+V+Der+Der/minen+N:%>^A^Ami xnen ;

LEXICON v2_ata !!≈ * **@CODE@** masinata etc, Prs+Sg3 masina/a, InfMa+Ade masinaamala, masinannu
v2 ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>^A K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ade:%>^Am^Al^A K ; ! 
+V+Act+Cond:%>i4s 2cond ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^N^U K ;


LEXICON v2_ata_odd !!≈ * **@CODE@** huomata etc, Prs+Sg3 huoma/a, InfMa+Ade huomaamalla
v2 ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>^A K ; 
+V+Act+Cond:%>i4s 2cond ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:%>^Am^All^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla


!LEXICON v2_uta_odd !!≈ * **@CODE@** haluta etc, Prs+Sg3 halu/aa !!NOT NEEDED?
!v2 ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>^A^A K ;
!+V+InfMa+Ade:%>^Am^Al^A K ; 
!+V+Act+Cond:%>^Ai4s 2cond ;


LEXICON v2_uta !!≈ * **@CODE@** haluta etc, Prs+Sg3 halu/aa
v2 ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>^A^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond:%>^Ai4s 2cond ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:%>^Am^All^A K ; 


LEXICON v2_havata  !!≈ * **@CODE@** havata-paradigm EJ KLART
+V+Inf:%>t^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:tt%>en K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:tt%>et K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:tt%>ee K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:tt%>emm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:tt%>ett^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:tt%>ev^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:tt%>^ev^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:tt%>e K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:tt%>in K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:tt%>it K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:tt%>i K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:tt%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:tt%>itt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:tt%>it K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:tt%>iv^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:tt%>iv^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WG%>th^A^An K ;

!+V+Inf+Tra:%>^Akse PxK ;
!+V+InfE+Ins:%>en K ;
!+V+InfE+Ine:%>ess^A K ;
!+V+InfMa+Ill:%>^Amh^A^An K ; 
!+V+InfMa+Ill:%>^Am^HMET2%>h^A^An K ;
!+V+InfMa+Ine:%>^Am^Ass^A K ;
!+V+InfMa+Ela:%>^Am^Ast^A K ;
!+V+InfMa+Ade:%>^Am^All^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
!+V+InfMa+Abe:%>^Am^Att^A K ;

!+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%^WG%>th^A^An K ;
!+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%^WG%>thiin K ;
!+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%^WG%>t^A K ;
!+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%^WG%>t^U K ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>nhee ptc_obl ; ! 
!+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:n^HMET2%>heet K ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:t%>t^U K ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:t%>t^Ut K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:t%>t^Av^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:t%>t^Av^At K ;
!+V+Pass+Cond:%>i4si K ;

!+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:^WG # ;
!+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>kh^O^On # ;
!+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kh^A^A # ;
!+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ;

!+V+Act+Cond:%>i4s 2cond ;
!+V+Der+Der/minen+N:%>^A^Ami xnen ;

LEXICON ptc_obl
 +Sg+Gen:%>n PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>see n_PxK ; 
 +Sg+Ine:%>ss^A PxK ;  
 +Sg+Ela:%>st^A PxK ;  
 +Sg+All:%>le PxxK ;   
 +Sg+Ade:%>l^A PxK ;   
 +Sg+Abl:%>lt^A PxK ;  
 +Sg+Tra: TRA ;        
 +Sg+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;   
 +Sg+Abe:%>tt^A PxK ;  
 +Pl+Nom:%>t PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>itten PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:%>itt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>isii n_PxK ; 
 +Pl+Ine:%>iss^A PxK ;  
 +Pl+Ela:%>ist^A PxK ;  
 +Pl+All:%>ile PxxK ;   
 +Pl+Ade:%>il^A PxK ;   
 +Pl+Abl:%>ilt^A PxK ;  
 +Pl+Tra: TRA ;        
 +Pl+Ess:%>in^A PxK ;   
 +Pl+Abe:%>itt^A PxK ;  


LEXICON v3_syä  !!≈ * **@CODE@** syä, myä, lyä .#.
+V+Inf:%>ä KK ;
+V+Inf:y%>ä KK ;
+V+Inf:y%>jä KK ;
:ö v3_other ;

+V+InfMa:ö 3infcase ;
+V+Inf+Tra:%>^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:ö%>en K ; ! xxx
+V+InfE+Ine:ö%>ess^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:öm^HMET2%>h^A^An K ; ! also hm 

LEXICON v3_jua  !!≈ * **@CODE@** jua, lua, sua, tua .#.
+V+Inf:%>a KK ;
+V+Inf:o%>a KK ;
+V+Inf:o%>ja KK ;
:o v3_other ;

+V+InfMa:o 3infcase ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:om^HMET2%>h^A^An K ; ! also hm 
+V+Inf+Tra:%>j^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:%>jen K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:%>jess^A K ;

LEXICON v3_ja !for inf with ’a; saaja !!HOW to solve this?
+V+Inf:%>’^A K ;
+V+Inf:%>h^A K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:%>’ess^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>’^Ut K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>j^Ut K ;
v3_j ;

LEXICON v3_ta  !!≈ * **@CODE@** maata
v3_other ;
+V+Inf:%>t^A K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:%>tess^A K ;
+V+InfMa: 3infcase ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:m^HMET2%>h^A^An K ; ! also hm 
+V+Inf+Tra:%>t^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:%>ten K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:%>tess^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Ut K ;


!LEXICON v3_jä !for inf with ’ä; viejä !!HOW to solve this with ^A?
!+V+Inf:’ä K ;
!+V+Inf:hä K ;
!+V+InfE+Ine:%>’essä K ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>’yt K ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>jyt K ;
!v3_j ;

LEXICON v3_j  !!≈ * **@CODE@** !for viejä mfl
+V+Inf:%>j^A KK ;
!+V+Inf:’%>^A KK ; !not working, why?
v3_other ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:t%>i3 K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>^HMETAmh^A^An K ; ! 
+V+InfMa+Ine:%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:%>m^Al^A K ; !-la!
+V+InfMa+Abe:%>m^Att^A K ;

+V+InfMa+Ill:h%>m^A^An K ; !viehmään en gång
!+V+InfMa+Ill:m^HMET2%>h^A^An K ; ! HÄR 3 ggr 
+V+Inf+Tra:%>j^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:%>jen K ;
+V+InfE+Ins:%>’en K ;
+V+InfE+Ins:%>en K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:%>jess^A K ;

LEXICON v3_viä !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+V+Inf:ä KK ;
:e v3_j ;

!LEXICON v3_inf
!+V+InfMa: 3infcase ;

LEXICON v3_other ! 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>pi K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>pii K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>t K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%^WG%>h^A^An K ; 
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>^A K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>i3m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i3v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i3v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^Av^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Av^At K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>h^Nee x3_oblique ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>n^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>n^HMET2%>heet K;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Ut K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>^Ut K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>i3s K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kh^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;

+V+Act+Cond:%>i3s 2cond ; 
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i3s%>im^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i3s%>it K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i3s%>iv^A K ;
+V+Der+Der/minen+N:mi xnen ;
