src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** = The verb list 
syä:sy v3_syä ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
jua:ju v3_jua ;   !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
viejä:vie v3_ja ; ! testing _ja
viä:vi v3_viä ; 
saaja:saa v3_ja ;
saa’a:saa v3_ja ;
voija:voi v3_ja ;
naija:nai v3_ja ;
uija:ui v3_ja ;
puija:pui v3_ja ;
lua:lu v3_jua ;
sua:su v3_jua ;
tua:tu v3_jua ;
myä:my v3_syä ;
jääjä:jää v3_ja ;
lyä:ly v3_syä ;
soija:soi v3_ja ;
myyta:myy v3_ta ;
laiminlyä:laimin#ly v3_syä ;
uloslyä:ulos#ly v3_syä ;
naija:nai v3_ja ;
palmikoija:palmikoi v3_ja ;
vasikoija:vasikoi v3_ja ;
haarukoija:haarukoi v3_ja ;
kapaloija:kapaloi v3_ja ;
kromeloija:kromeloi v3_ja ;
kaaveloija:kaaveloi v3_ja ;
koveloija:koveloi v3_ja ;
kupuloija:kupuloi v3_ja ;
salamoija:salamoi v3_ja ;
puikkaroija:puikkaroi v3_ja ;
jolkkaroija:jolkkaroi v3_ja ;
mookaroija:mookaroi v3_ja ;
koparoija:koparoi v3_ja ;
veivaroija:veivaroi v3_ja ;
koperoija:koperoi v3_ja ;
kompuroija:kompuroi v3_ja ;
kippuroija:kippuroi v3_ja ;
tantturoija:tantturoi v3_ja ;
tentturoija:tentturoi v3_ja ;
karittoija:karittoi v3_ja ;
palavoija:palavoi v3_ja ;
haravoija:haravoi v3_ja ;
tingata:tinka v2_ata_odd ;
kohata:kohta v2_ata_odd ;
spreiata:spreia v2_ata_odd ;
peijata:peija v2_ata_odd ;
korjata:korja v2_ata_odd ;
snakata:snakka v2_ata_odd ;
niikata:niikka v2_ata_odd ;
malkata:malkka v2_ata_odd ;
klinkata:klinkka v2_ata_odd ;
juokata:juokka v2_ata_odd ;
saskata:saska v2_ata_odd ;
toskata:toska v2_ata_odd ;
laukata:laukka v2_ata_odd ;
talata:tala v2_ata_odd ;
nilata:nila v2_ata_odd ;
jollata:jolla v2_ata_odd ;
koplata:kopla v2_ata_odd ;
anmäälata:anmääla v2_ata ;
loimata:loima v2_ata_odd ;
juumata:juuma v2_ata_odd ;
liinata:liina v2_ata_odd ;
masinata:masina v2_ata ;
siunata:siuna v2_ata_odd ;
kipata:kippa v2_ata_odd ;
nopata:noppa v2_ata_odd ;
tupata:tuppa v2_ata_odd ;
analyseerata:analyseera v2_ata ;
komyniseerata:komyniseera v2_ata ;
organiseerata:organiseera v2_ata ;
filosofeerata:filosofeera v2_ata ;
linjeerata:linjeera v2_ata ;
lakeerata:lakeera v2_ata ;
maskeerata:maskeera v2_ata ;
taleerata:taleera v2_ata ;
tisleerata:tisleera v2_ata ;
puleerata:puleera v2_ata ;
patuleerata:patuleera v2_ata_odd ;
planeerata:planeera v2_ata ;
porneerata:porneera v2_ata ;
takseerata:takseera v2_ata ;
ukseerata:ukseera v2_ata ;
pukseerata:pukseera v2_ata ;
äkseerata:äkseera v2_ata ;
laventeerata:laventeera v2_ata_odd ;
funteerata:funteera v2_ata ;
hunteerata:hunteera v2_ata ;
värteerata:värteera v2_ata ;
protesteerata:protesteera v2_ata ;
prutesteerata:prutesteera v2_ata ;
tisteerata:tisteera v2_ata ;
justeerata:justeera v2_ata ;
kuitteerata:kuitteera v2_ata ;
hantteerata:hantteera v2_ata ;
plantteerata:plantteera v2_ata ;
montteerata:montteera v2_ata ;
sortteerata:sortteera v2_ata ;
kraveerata:kraveera v2_ata ;
särveerata:särveera v2_ata ;
tierata:tiera v2_ata ;
ajerata:ajera v2_ata ;
talerata:talera v2_ata ;
poorata:poora v2_ata_odd ;
skorrata:skorra v2_ata_odd ;
jurata:jura v2_ata_odd ;
traisata:traisa v2_ata_odd ;
osata:osa v2_ata_odd ;
vuossata:vuossa v2_ata_odd ;
latata:latta v2_ata_odd ;
meltata:meltta v2_ata_odd ;
luntata:luntta v2_ata_odd ;
mestata:mesta v2_ata_odd ;
luutata:luutta v2_ata_odd ;
kruuata:kruua v2_ata_odd ;
havata:hava v2_havata ;
veivata:veiva v2_ata_odd ;
arvata:arva v2_ata_odd ;
luvata:luva v2_ata_odd ;
tangota:tanko v2_uta ;
pongota:ponko v2_uta ;
lihota:liho v2_uta ;
verhota:verho v2_uta ;
tarjota:tarjo v2_uta ;
keikota:keikko v2_uta ;
mulkota:mulkko v2_uta ;
poukota:poukko v2_uta ;
ilota:ilo v2_uta ;
tolota:tolo v2_uta ;
ammota:ammo v2_uta ;
janota:jano v2_uta ;
pinota:pino v2_uta ;
koota:koko v2_uta ;
ripota:rippo v2_uta ;
kirota:kiro v2_uta ;
irrota:irto v2_uta ;
pisota:piso v2_uta ;
leuota:leuko v2_uta ;
pivota:pivo v2_uta ;
tohuta:tohu v2_uta ;
noijuta:noiju v2_uta ;
flakuta:flakku v2_uta ;
lieskuta:liesku v2_uta ;
kiukuta:kiukku v2_uta ;
kaluta:kalu v2_uta ;
lulluta:lullu v2_uta ;
lemuta:lemu v2_uta ;
loimuta:loimu v2_uta ;
kulmuta:kulmu v2_uta ;
kihnuta:kihnu v2_uta ;
kieputa:kieppu v2_uta ;
kimputa:kimppu v2_uta ;
ruuputa:ruuppu v2_uta ;
juoruta:juoru v2_uta ;
praasuta:praasu v2_uta ;
lisuta:lisu v2_uta ;
virsuta:virsu v2_uta ;
tuituta:tuittu v2_uta ;
kliivuta:kliivu v2_uta ;
nuovuta:nuovu v2_uta ;
räivätä:räivä v2_ata_odd ;
hävetä:häpe v2_uta ;
krynkytä:krynkky v2_uta ;
tyllytä:tylly v2_uta ;
värytä:väry v2_uta ;
tryskätä:tryskä v2_ata_odd ;
kylmätä:kylmä v2_ata_odd ;
törrätä:törrä v2_ata_odd ;
pormäntätä:pormänttä v2_ata ;
mettätä:mett2ä v2_ata_odd ;
kärrötä:kärrö v2_uta ;
myyä:myy v3_ja ;
